District of Columbia statutes.
10-1603.03

Assemblage of soccer stadium site.

[Not funded].

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-233, § 103, 62 DCR 438
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 2182(c), 62 DCR 10905

History

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36, in (a)(2), would have substituted “is authorized to acquire” for “shall acquire” and would have deleted “as described in the letter of intent between the District and Potomac Electric Power Company (“PEPCO”) dated December 27, 2013”; would have rewritten (d); and would have deleted “as described in the letter of intent between the District and PEPCO dated December 27, 2013” in (e).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(c) of the Soccer Stadium Development Technical Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-17, July 22, 2015, 62 DCR 6876).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 101 of the Soccer Stadium Development Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-557, Dec. 30, 2014, 62 DCR 448, 20 STAT 4467).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(c) of the Soccer Stadium Development Technical Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-59, May 8, 2015, 62 DCR 5962, 21 DCSTAT 1434).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2182(c) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Emergency Legislation

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-233: Section 301 of D.C. Law 20-233 provided (1) that the act shall apply upon the date of inclusions of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan; (2) that the Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council of the certification; and (3) that the Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in the District of Columbia Register and that the date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the applicability of the act.

Editor's Notes